California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) For purposes of this section, “eligible recipient” means any person legally residing in this state who is a recipient of benefits under the federal Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI) program, provided for pursuant to Title II of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 401, et seq.) and whose income and resources are not in excess of the federal poverty level. For purposes of determining eligibility under this section, income and resources shall be defined in the same manner as those terms are used in determining eligibility for aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fiscal Provisions [12600. - 12601.]

12600.

The department shall reimburse the counties for the cost of actual payments made pursuant to this chapter and for the administrative costs actually attributable to such payments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12601.

Funds for the costs and administration of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 12525) and 3 (commencing with Section 12550) of this chapter shall be limited to the amounts and controls set forth in the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Loans to Blind Persons [12700. - 12700.]

12700.

There is in the State Treasury a permanent revolving fund, in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), to be known as the Revolving Loan Fund, and to be administered by the department. The fund shall be used to make loans to recipients of aid to the aged, blind, or disabled due to blindness under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), at a rate of interest not to exceed 3 percent per year, to enable those recipients to establish themselves in businesses, professions, or other gainful employment, including, but not limited to self-employment or to assist those already engaged in such endeavors. No loan in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) shall be made to any individual under this section.

The department shall establish through the Office of Services to the Blind the terms and conditions of loans made pursuant to this section, and shall prescribe the procedure to be followed in making application for such loans. All funds received in repayment of loans made pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Revolving Loan Fund, and shall be available for the making of additional loans as provided in this section.

The collection procedures appropriate to the purposes and objectives of the loan fund shall be prescribed by the Office of Services to the Blind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 11.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.1. Social Services [13000. - 13008.]

13000.

The purpose of this chapter is to set forth those policies and procedures as are necessary to accommodate reductions in federal funds provided under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act as amended by the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 40.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

Funding for social services programs administered by county welfare departments shall include but not be limited to federal funds received under Titles IV, XIX, and XX of the federal Social Security Act, and the State General Fund. The appropriation and allocation of these funds shall be in accordance with the annual Budget Act and the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 999, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

From the funds described in Section 13001 each county shall receive three allocations. The first allocation shall be for support of Child Welfare Services as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500 of Part 4). This allocation shall be known as the Child Welfare Services Grant. The second allocation shall be for support of protective services for adults, and other services directed at the five national goals specified in Section 13003. This allocation shall be known as the County Services Block Grant. The third allocation shall be for in-home supportive services administration. The notice of such action must be provided at least seven days prior to the meeting at which such action is to be taken. Such notice shall be provided in the same manner as the county provides notice for its regularly scheduled meetings. Funds from the Child Welfare Services Grant and the County Services Block Grant and the in-home supportive services administration allocations shall be available only when matched by county funds pursuant to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 43.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13003.

County allocations may be used to provide necessary training and shall be used to provide social services which meet the following five federal goals of Title XX of the federal Social Security Act.

(1) Achieve or maintaining self-support to prevent, reduce, or eliminate dependency.

(2) Achieving or maintaining self-sufficiency, including reduction or prevention of dependency.

(3) Preventing or remedying neglect, abuse, exploitation of children and adults unable to protect their own interests, or reuniting families.

(4) Preventing or reducing inappropriate institutional care by providing community-based care, home-based care, or other forms of less intensive care.

(5) Securing referral or admission for institutional care when other forms of care are not appropriate or providing services to individuals or institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 40.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.

Counties, in expending the County Services Block Grant allocation shall provide protective services for adults pursuant to Section 12251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 44.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.

Counties, after expending the County Services Block Grant allocation for the priorities specified in Section 13004 may expend any remaining funds for other services directed at the five goals specified in Section 13003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 51.5.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13006.

Regulations promulgated by the department relating to protective services for adults shall provide counties with maximum flexibility in determining the type and level of services and use of funds for such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 45.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13007.

Each county shall report to the State Department of Social Services all necessary information in order to comply with federal and state requirements for the social services block grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 40.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

13008.

Federal funds for Refugee Social Services that are allocated to county welfare departments for Title XX social services shall be allocated to each county in the same proportion that refugees on aid in each county bear to the total refugees on aid in the state. Federal funds for Targeted Assistance Services that are allocated to county welfare departments shall be allocated to each targeted county in the same proportion that refugees on aid bear to the total refugees on aid in the targeted counties. The allocation shall be developed from caseload statistics from the previous fiscal year which include refugees in the following programs:

(a) Time-eligible and time-expired refugees in the Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) program.

(b) General Assistance.

(c) The Refugee Cash Assistance Program.

(d) The Refugee Demonstration Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1182, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.4. California Newcomer Education and Well-Being (CalNEW) Program [13265. - 13265.]

13265.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the State Department of Social Services shall administer, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, the California Newcomer Education and Well-Being Program (CalNEW) to provide services for newcomer pupils, English learners, and immigrant families. The department shall allocate funding to
 school districts
 and county offices of education with significant numbers of newcomer pupils, or a significant population of English learner pupils. Funds allocated under this section shall be used to plan, design, and implement academic and social support services for the purpose of improving pupils’ academic engagement and social and emotional well-being. The department shall have sole discretion to determine which school
 districts, county offices of education, and services to fund.

(b) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Contract to conduct a formal evaluation of the services provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Contract to provide
 technical assistance to support implementation of the services described in this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “English learner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 306 of the Education Code.

(2) “Immigrant families” means families with household members and immediate relatives of pupils in which one or more of the members or relatives are not United States citizens.

(3) “Newcomer pupil” has the same meaning as “immigrant children and youth” as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(d) In accordance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this section provides services for undocumented persons.

(e) The State Department of Education shall, for the duration of the program described in this section, cooperate with the department to provide all data, data systems, and source code requested to the department for the purpose of effectively operating this program.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law:

(1) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(g) Funds appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act shall be
 available for encumbrance or expenditure for two fiscal years and liquidation for another three fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 101.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Administration of Refugee Social Services and Refugee Cash Assistance [13275. - 13286.]

13275.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Eligible county” means a county or city and county designated as impacted using a formula developed by the department based upon the refugee arrivals in the county during the preceding 60-month period for which the department has data.

(b) “Qualified nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit organization that is either exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or exempt from state income taxation under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code and that satisfies any additional eligibility criteria
 established by the department.

(c) “Refugee social services” include, but are not limited to, English language and employment training, as funded through federal appropriations.

(d) “Service provider” means a qualified nonprofit organization or private for-profit organization selected by the department to administer refugee services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (AB 1318)   Effective October 7, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13276.

(a) (1) After setting aside the necessary state administrative funds, the department shall allocate appropriated federal funds for refugee social services programs to each eligible county and, if the department exercises its discretion pursuant to subdivision (b), to a service provider, based on the number of refugees receiving aid in the eligible county or the number of refugees that reside in the eligible county. The department may, at its discretion, utilize funding adjustments based on the length of time that the refugees have resided in the United States.

(2) If an eligible county or service provider that receives funds under paragraph (1) declines all or part of those funds, or returns unexpended funds, the department may exercise its discretion to reallocate the declined or returned funds among eligible counties and service providers.

(3) If the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement provides funding in addition to the annual appropriation described in paragraph (1) or designates funding for services to a specific population of eligible individuals, the department may exercise its discretion to allocate those funds among eligible counties and service providers consistent with federal law.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, the department may, at its discretion, contract with, or award grants to, service providers for the purpose of administering refugee social services programs within a county. An eligible county providing refugee social services pursuant to this chapter may continue to administer those services while a contractor or grantee is also providing refugee social services pursuant to this chapter within the county. The department shall prioritize funding qualified nonprofit organizations and counties over for-profit organizations, when practicable.

(2) If an eligible county and a service provider are administering refugee social services simultaneously within the same county, the department shall, at its discretion, determine the amount of the funds to be distributed to the eligible county and service provider.

(3) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall require reporting, monitoring, or audits of services provided, as determined by the department.

(c) The department shall track and document the funding provided to each type of service provider and the purposes for use of this funding, and report this information to the appropriate fiscal and policy staff of the Legislature on a semiannual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 61.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13277.

(a) The department shall notify each eligible county’s board of supervisors of the availability of funds described in subdivision (a) of Section 13276.

(b) (1) A county administering refugee social services shall designate an agency that is responsible for developing and implementing a plan for the provision of services funded by refugee social services funds.

(2) Until October 1, 1990, paragraph (1) does not apply to any county on whose behalf the department is administering the refugee employment social services funds.

(c) (1) The plan developed
 pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be in accordance with Sections 13278 and 13279.

(2) The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall reflect the full intent of this chapter that the funding for, and provision of, refugee social services shall lead to successful self-sufficiency and social integration for all refugee recipients of refugee social services, in accordance with guidelines issued by the department.

(3) Any plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall, at a minimum, meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Each eligible county’s board of supervisors shall ensure that the county planning process is designed in such a way as to facilitate refugee participation and public input in that process.

(B) The plan shall include a
 description of how available funds will be used to provide services to refugees.

(C) The plan shall specifically address how services will be delivered to refugees receiving aid in each county.

(D) The plan shall provide for the priority consideration for funding refugee community-based organizations if they demonstrate the capacity to implement the proposed programs, which capacity shall be comparable to that of other competitors who qualify for funding.

(d) Any plan described in Section 11321.6 that is developed by any county that elects to utilize these funds to pay for any service provided to, or any activity performed on behalf of, any refugee participating in the program authorized by Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 shall meet the requirements of Section 13280.

(e) (1) Prior to October 1, 1990, the department shall discontinue administering refugee employment social services funds for a county pursuant to the request of the county.

(2) Commencing October 1, 1990, the department shall discontinue administering refugee employment social services funds on behalf of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 86.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13278.

Commencing October 1, 1990, a county shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, utilize funds as described in Section 13276 to pay for the costs of any services provided to, or activity performed on behalf of, any refugee participating in the program authorized under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 if that cost is allowed under a plan described in Section 11321.6 and federal requirements for refugee social services programs. The plan shall be developed with significant participation by, and input from, refugee community organizations, voluntary agencies, and other local public and private entities involved in the refugee resettlement process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 87.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13279.

Refugee social services programs shall be available to recipients of refugee cash assistance and refugees receiving county general assistance in eligible counties. If the county does not provide these services under the program authorized under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2, a portion of the funds allocated to the county in accordance with Section 13276 may be used to provide services to recipients of refugee cash assistance and refugee recipients of general assistance based on federal requirements and service needs, as outlined in the county plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13277.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 282.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13280.

(a) (1) In counties receiving federal refugee social services funding, the county welfare department shall include in its CalWORKs plan a section that specifically addresses the provision of services for refugee applicants for, and recipients of, aid pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and the orderly transition of those applicants and recipients into the CalWORKs program.

(2) County staff responsible for the administration of CalWORKs shall work in conjunction with county staff responsible for the administration of refugee programs, as well as with representatives of local mutual assistance associations, voluntary agencies, and other organizations involved in refugee resettlement, to ensure that the section of the CalWORKs
 plan specified in paragraph (1) reflects the needs of the refugee applicants for, and recipients of, aid under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program, the services are delivered in accordance with the section of the county’s CalWORKs plan specified in paragraph (1), and that this transition occurs as quickly as possible within resources available to the CalWORKs program.

(b) The department shall annually reevaluate that section of the county’s CalWORKs plan which is developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). This reevaluation shall be made in conjunction with the county’s development of its annual overall CalWORKs plan update and will be subject to approval of the department.

(c) (1) A county may maintain within the CalWORKs program a supplemental services component for refugees who would otherwise be temporarily excepted from
 the full range of CalWORKs services. These services shall complement regular services provided through Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2, to prepare the refugee for self-sufficiency or eventual transition into the CalWORKs program and shall be funded through federal refugee social services funds. County boards of supervisors may determine how the services are administered, subject to federal funding requirements.

(2) Any county that elects to implement the supplemental services component authorized by this subdivision shall fully describe the component in the section of its CalWORKs plan required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The description shall specify the types of services planned to meet the special needs of refugees. Those services shall be in accordance with the department’s guidelines.

(3) The CalWORKs refugee supplemental services authorized
 by this subdivision for refugee TANF applicants and recipients, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall meet the requirements of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193) and shall be subject to the approval of the department.

(4) Refugee TANF applicants and recipients who are referred for participation in the supplemental services component authorized by this subdivision shall participate in the component services as a condition of eligibility under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and shall be subject to the sanctions specified by Section 11327.5 if the services meet the requirements of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193), and are determined by the county to prepare a refugee for self-sufficiency.

(5) Refugee TANF recipients already
 participating in a CalWORKs component provided through Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 shall not be removed from that component for the purpose of participating in the supplemental services component authorized by paragraph (1).

(d) Any county that elects to implement the supplemental services component authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall provide the supportive services described in subdivision (e) of Section 11323.2. These supportive services shall be funded with refugee social services funds. CalWORKs supportive services funds shall not be used to fund those supportive services.

(e) This section shall be implemented only in counties where federal refugee social services funds are available to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 283.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13282.

The requirements established by this chapter shall be applicable only so long as federal funds are available for its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 91.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13283.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall ensure that noncitizen victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 18945, have access to refugee cash assistance, and refugee social services set forth in this chapter, to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code. These individuals shall be subject to the same work requirements and exemptions as other participants, provided that compliance with these requirements is authorized by law. An exemption from these requirements shall be available if physical or psychological trauma related to or arising from the victimization impedes their ability to comply. Assistance and services under this section shall
 be paid from state funds to the extent federal funding is unavailable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 92.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13284.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, the department may, in its discretion, contract with, or issue grants to, service providers for the purpose of administering federally funded refugee cash assistance within a county. An eligible county providing refugee cash assistance pursuant to this section may continue to administer the refugee cash assistance while a contractor or grantee is also providing refugee cash assistance pursuant to this section within the county.

(b) The department shall require that service providers awarded contracts or grants pursuant to this section report, monitor, or audit the services provided, as determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 63.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13285.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded by the department to a qualified service provider pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from both of the following:

(1) The personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded by the department to a service provider pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 64.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13286.

A refugee shall not be denied resettlement anywhere in California based on any criterion, method of administration, or practice that has the purpose or effect of discriminating on the basis of race, religion, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic identified in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (AB 3133)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.6. Services for Undocumented Persons [13300. - 13310.]

13300.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding in the act that added this chapter or the annual Budget Act, the department shall contract, as described in Section 13301, with qualified nonprofit legal services organizations to provide legal and social services, as needed, to immigrant youth. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide improved and coordinated access to social services alongside the provision of state-funded immigration-related legal services for more immigrant youth in California and that programs should provide for, at a minimum, the level of quality of individual services as enabled as a result of the appropriations made in the 2026 Budget Act.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 13301, the term “immigrant youth” means an immigrant younger than 21 years of age in removal proceedings or an unaccompanied undocumented minor.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Unaccompanied undocumented minors” means unaccompanied children as described in Section 279(g)(2) of Title 6 of the United States Code.

(2) “Legal services” means culturally and linguistically appropriate services provided by attorneys, paralegals, interpreters and other support staff for state court proceedings, federal immigration proceedings, and any appeals arising from those proceedings.

(3) “Social services” means culturally and linguistically appropriate services, including, but not limited to, intake screenings and assessments, coordination of care, and navigation services, provided by social workers, caseworkers, interpreters, and other support staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 21.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13300.5.

(a) (1) Subject to the availability of state funding, the state shall provide legal counsel to every immigrant youth in the State of California.

(2) (A) The department shall allocate funding according to this section. In determining the amount and allocation of contracts awarded pursuant to this section, the department shall consider whether federal funding has been made available and dispersed to organizations or relevant projects in the state.

(B) The department shall prioritize awards of contracts or grants to qualified nonprofit organizations as described in Section 13301 that ineligible for federal funds or that have unmet needs
 despite federal assistance.

(b) Counsel shall be conferred pursuant to this section as follows:

(1) Access to counsel shall begin at the time an immigrant youth is designated as unaccompanied by a federal or state agency or identified as such by an immigration attorney.

(2) Access to counsel may apply in state court proceedings or submitting an affirmative filing for purposes of obtaining any order necessary for or relevant to immigration remedies, federal immigration proceedings, any related appearances or matters, and any appeals arising from those proceedings, before the United States Department of Homeland Security, federal court, or the Department of Justice.

(3) Access to counsel does not need to be provided if the immigrant youth has independent
 counsel.

(4) Access to counsel applies to a child who has been designated an immigrant youth at any time throughout the pendency of any of the proceedings identified in paragraphs (1) and (2). If an immigrant youth has been assigned counsel before the immigrant youth reaches 18 years of age, the immigrant youth remains eligible for ongoing access to counsel during the pendency of the proceedings.

(c) The department shall contract to provide legal counsel for immigrant youth with either of the following:

(1) A qualified nonprofit legal services organization, as described in Section 13301.

(2) An office of the public defender for the county, as established pursuant to Section 27700 of the Government Code, if the public defender meets all of the following
 requirements:

(A) The office has an immigration attorney with at least three years of experience handling asylum, T-Visa, U-Visa, or special immigrant juvenile status cases and has represented at least 20 minors in these matters.

(B) The office has an immigration attorney with experience representing minors in removal proceedings and asylum applications.

(C) The office has an immigration attorney who has conducted trainings on these issues for practitioners beyond their staff.

(3) The department may impose additional requirements for an office of public defender for the county to be eligible for a contract.

(d) For purposes of this section, an immigrant youth is a person residing in, or
 formerly residing, California, and is either of the following:

(1) The person is an undocumented minor as described in Section 279(g)(2) of Title 6 of the United States Code.

(2) The person is under 18 years of age, has no lawful immigration status, arrived in the United States without a parent or legal guardian, or has no parent or legal guardian available and able to assist in the youth’s immigration proceedings.

(e) The department shall require contractors pursuant to this section to maintain adequate legal malpractice insurance as necessary and to indemnify and hold the state harmless from any claims that arise from the legal services provided pursuant to this section.

(f) The department may fund social work services contracted by qualified
 nonprofit legal service organizations to assist immigrant youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   (AB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.

Contracts awarded pursuant to Section 13300 shall fulfill all of the following:

(a) Be executed only with nonprofit legal services organizations that meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Have at least three years of experience handling asylum, T-Visa, U-Visa, or special immigrant juvenile status cases and have represented at least 25 individuals in these matters.

(2) Have experience in representing individuals in removal proceedings and asylum applications.

(3) Have conducted trainings on these issues for practitioners beyond their staff.

(4) Have experience guiding and supervising the work of attorneys who themselves do not regularly participate in this area of the law but nevertheless work pro bono on the types of cases described in paragraph (1).

(5) Are accredited through the Recognition and Accreditation Program under the United States Department of Justice’s Executive Office for Immigration Review or meet the requirements to receive funding from the Trust Fund Program administered by the State Bar of California.

(b) (1) Provide for legal and social services to immigrant youth through a funding method, as determined by the department, that may include administrative and supervisory costs, client services, and court fees.

(2) Prioritize the provision of social services to eligible immigrant youth, either directly or through partnerships, which may be satisfied through direct service delivery or formal agreements.

(c) Require reporting, monitoring, or audits of services provided, as determined by the department.

(d) Require contractors to coordinate efforts with the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement Legal Access Project in order to respond to and assist or represent unaccompanied undocumented minors who could benefit
 from the services provided under this chapter.

(e) Require contractors to maintain adequate legal malpractice insurance and to indemnify and hold the state harmless from any claims that arise from the legal services provided pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 22.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13302.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(c) The client information and records of legal and social
 services provided pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the requirements of Section 10850 and shall be exempt from inspection under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) The state shall be immune from any liability resulting from the implementation of this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 23.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13303.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding in the act that added this section or the annual Budget Act, the department shall provide grants, as described in subdivision (b), to organizations qualified under Section 13304.

(b) Grants provided in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be for the purpose of providing one or more of the following services, as determined by the department:

(1) Services to persons residing in, or formerly residing in, California, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Services to assist with the application process for initial or renewal requests of deferred action under the DACA policy
 with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(B) Services to obtain other immigration remedies and benefits.

(C) Services to assist with the naturalization process and an appeal arising from the process.

(2) Services to provide legal training and technical assistance.

(3) (A) (i) Funds available for the purposes of this section shall not be used to provide legal services to an individual who has been convicted of, or who is currently appealing a conviction for, a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, or a serious felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “legal services” does not include activities relating to client intake, which shall be provided regardless of an individual’s criminal history.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), this section does not prohibit eligibility for services pursuant to this section for an individual whose criminal record is shown to be inaccurate.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “DACA” refers to Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals status as described in guidelines issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security.

(2) “Services to assist” includes, but is not limited to, outreach, workshop presentations, document review, Freedom of Information Act requests, and screening services that seek to assist individuals with the services described in subdivision (b).

(3) “Legal training and technical assistance” includes, but
 is not limited to, educational and capacity building activities that will augment the competent provision of legal services to immigrants, including for organizations located in and serving underserved communities.

(4) “Immigration remedies” include, but shall not be limited to, U-visas, T-visas, special immigrant juvenile status, Violence Against Women Act self-petitions, family-based petitions, cancellation of removal, and asylum or other remedies that may also include remedies necessary to enable pursuit of immigration protections.

(5) “Immigration benefits” include, but shall not be limited to, advanced parole, employment authorization documents, and lawful Permanent Resident Card renewal.

(d) No more than 40 percent of grant funds awarded to an organization qualified under Section 13304 shall be advanced to that organization.

(e) The department shall update the Legislature on the following information in the course of budget hearings:

(1) The timeline for implementation and administration of this section, including important upcoming dates.

(2) The participating organizations awarded contracts or grants, and the aggregate amounts awarded for each service described in subdivision (b).

(3) The number of applications submitted, and the aggregate amounts requested for each service described in subdivision (b).